Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-924
Cleaning project; road ditch, ditch, or watercourse; installation and maintenance of bridge or culvert; payment; county road funds.

Where the cleaning involves a road ditch or a ditch or watercourse that is crossed by a county or township bridge or culvert, the board, in its discretion, may provide for the use of county road funds for installation and maintenance of such bridge or culvert or to assist therein.

Laws 1959, c. 132, § 24, p. 492.